Hawaii statutes.
§371-6 Powers respecting oaths, subpoenas,
etc.; witness fees, expenses, immunities. In all hearings or
investigations conducted by the director of labor and industrial relations, or
any of the director's duly authorized subordinates, including a hearings
officer appointed by the appeal board under section 371-4, or the appeal board,
with respect to any matters cognizable by any of them, each of the officers,
and each member of the board, shall have the same powers respecting the
administering of oaths, compelling the attendance of witnesses, the production
of documentary evidence, and examining or causing to be examined witnesses, as
are possessed by a circuit court and may take depositions and certify to
official acts. The circuit court of any circuit upon application by any of
them shall have power to enforce by proper proceedings the attendance and
testimony of any witness so subpoenaed. Subpoena and witness fees and mileage
in such cases shall be the same as in criminal cases in the circuit courts. Necessary
expenses of or in connection with any such hearings or investigations shall be
payable from the funds appropriated for expenses of administration for the
department of labor and industrial relations.

No person shall be excused from attending or
testifying or producing material, books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, and
other records, before the director, the director's duly authorized subordinate,
including a hearings officer appointed by the appeal board under section 371-4,
or the appeal board, or in obedience to the subpoena of any of them, in any
cause or proceeding before them, on the grounds that the testimony and
evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may tend to
incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture; but no
individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or
on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which the individual
is compelled, after having claimed the individual's privilege against
self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise,
except that the individuals so testifying shall not be exempt from prosecution
and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying. [L 1939, c 237, §1(8);
RL 1945, §4111; RL 1955, §88-12; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §27; HRS §371-6; am L
1973, c 31, pt of §21; gen ch 1985; am L 2009, c 3, §3]

Cross References

Hearings, see chapter 91.

Oaths, see §§1-21, 621-12.

Subpoenas, see §621-1.

Rules of Court

Oaths, see HRCP rule 43(d).

Subpoenas, see HRCP rule 45.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next